North Dakota, session 69, HB1605.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 61-28.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Fluoride introduction prohibited - Penalty.
1. For purposes of this section:
a. "Fluoride" means any chemical compound containing the fluoride ion, including
sodium fluoride, hydrofluoric acid, sodium silicofluoride, and fluorosilicic acid.
b. "Public water supply" means a water system that provides water for human
consumption through pipes or other constructed conveyances to at least fifteen
service connections or serves an average of at least twenty-five people for at
least sixty days a year.
2. A person may not add or cause to be added any form of fluoride to any public water
supply for the purpose of fluoridation, regardless of the intended concentration.
3. This section does not apply to any water treatment process where fluoride is naturally
occurring in a water source or the use of fluoride for an industrial or manufacturing
process not related to public water treatment.
4. A person in violation of this section is subject to a fine of five hundred dollars, and
subject to a fine of one thousand dollars for a subsequent violation.
5. The department of environmental quality shall enforce this section.
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act becomes effective on August 1, 2026.
Page No. 1 25.0019.04000